Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 4. Benefit Claims

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

82 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare §§ 475 to 507.

§ 27-3-401.
Filing notice and electronic communications.

Benefit claims shall be filed in accordance with regulations of the commission.

Employers shall post information on benefit rights in locations accessible to employed individuals. Copies of regulations and information on benefit rights shall be supplied by the department at no cost.

A claimant or employer may elect to have determinations, decisions or notices transmitted electronically through an internet application approved by the department, in lieu of transmission through the regular mail. Once the election is made by the claimant or employer, any determination, decision or notice required to be mailed to that claimant or employer by this article may be transmitted instead through an internet application approved by the department. Upon the completion of every electronic transmission authorized by this subsection, the department shall provide to the claimant or employer an electronic acknowledgement specifying the date and time when the transmission was sent or received. Except as otherwise required by rules applicable to appeals to the courts of this state, determinations, decisions or notices transmitted by an approved electronic means may be appealed or protested by use of the same means. For the purpose of all relevant time limits established by this article, electronically transmitted information shall be deemed delivered on the date indicated on the acknowledgment required by this subsection, or if no acknowledgement exists, on the date the electronic delivery is initiated by the party sending the information.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6-8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2017 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 13, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

added (c).

Laws 2017, ch. 6, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 13, 2017.

Inconsistent administrative provisions superseded. —

To the extent the provisions of this section (now article) are inconsistent with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (§

16-3-101

et seq.), they are superseded. Sage Club v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 601 P.2d 1306,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1979).

Review of decisions. —

On appeals, the supreme court must review the decision of the district court and the employment security commission in the exact same light. Sage Club v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 601 P.2d 1306,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 479

(Wyo. 1979).

Decision conclusive upon failure to appeal. —

Where judicial review is granted by this section (now article), but no appeal is taken, the decision of the commission becomes conclusive. Salt Creek Freightways v. Wyoming Fair Employment Practices Comm'n, 598 P.2d 435,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 439

(Wyo. 1979).

Commission decision res judicata. —

The decision of the employment security commission that an employee was not discriminated against on account of her religious practices is a bar to relitigation of that issue before the fair employment commission under the doctrine of res judicata. Salt Creek Freightways v. Wyoming Fair Employment Practices Comm'n, 598 P.2d 435,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 439

(Wyo. 1979).

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993);
Hat Six Homes, Inc. v. State, 6 P.3d 1287,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 2000); Koch v. Dep't of Empl., 2013 WY 12,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Jan 31, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Declaratory relief with respect to unemployment compensation, 14 ALR2d 826.

Repayment of unemployment compensation benefits erroneously paid, 90 ALR3d 987.

Unemployment compensation: eligibility as affected by claimant's refusal to work at reduced compensation, 95 ALR3d 449.

Part-time or intermittent workers as covered by or as eligible for benefits under state unemployment compensation act, 95 ALR3d 891.

§ 27-3-402.
Determination; generally; referral to special examiner; redetermination; notice; appeal.

Determination of a claim filed pursuant to W.S. 27-3-401(a) shall be made promptly by a deputy designated by the department. If a claim is denied, the determination shall state the reasons for denial. Except as provided by subsection (c) of this section, a determination is final unless a party entitled to notice applies for redetermination or appeals the determination within twenty-eight (28) days after notice is mailed to his last known address of record.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 73, § 3.

A monetary determination at the beginning of a benefit year shall specify if the claimant earned wages in amounts required by W.S. 27-3-306(d) and, if so, the first day of the benefit year, his weekly benefit amount and the maximum total amount of benefits payable for the benefit year. The deputy may reconsider a monetary determination if he finds an error in computation or identity, or discovers wages of the claimant relevant to but not considered in the determination. A monetary determination is final unless a party entitled to notice files a timely protest provided, however, that the department in its discretion may make a monetary redetermination at any time prior to the end of the benefit year whether or not a party has filed a timely protest.

Notice of a determination shall be mailed promptly to the claimant at his last known address of record. Notice of a determination involving application of W.S.

27-3-308

, 27-3-311(a)(i) and (f) and 27-3-313(a)(i), together with reasons, shall be given to the last employing unit of the claimant at the last known address of record of the employing unit or, if the address is unavailable, the best available address. Notices shall be mailed to all base period employers at the address of record.

The claimant or any other party entitled to notice of a determination may appeal the determination to an appeal tribunal. The appeal shall be filed with the tribunal within twenty-eight (28) days after notice is mailed to the last known address of record of the interested party.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1992, ch. 10, § 1; 1996, ch. 4, § 2; 1999, ch. 73, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, § 2; 2015 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, transferred the former third sentence in (a) to the beginning of (c); also in (c) deleted the former second sentence which read: “A deputy may reconsider a nonmonetary or chargeability determination if a party entitled to notice or the department files a protest in writing within fifteen (15) days of the date the determination was mailed, except for determinations of which the last employer was given notice as specified under subsection (d) of this section,” and rewrote the last sentence; and in (d), deleted “or a redetermination” in the first sentence and rewrote the last sentence as two sentences, requiring notice to be mailed to the last known address of record.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “twenty-eight (28) days” for “fifteen (15) days” in (a) and (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Subsection (c) grounds required for reconsideration. —

The employment security commission lacks authority to reconsider its own ruling in contested case when that ruling was made by the full commission at the final stage of intra-agency review, unless the grounds for reconsideration listed in subsection (c) are present. Decisions of the full commission sitting as an appellate tribunal are final unless a judicial appeal is taken to the district court by an unsuccessful party. Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Applied

in

Gibson v. Wyoming Div. of Unemployment Ins., 907 P.2d 1306,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1995).

Quoted

in

Casper Iron & Metal, Inc. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n of Dep't of Emp., 845 P.2d 387,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited in

Koch v. Dep't of Empl., 2013 WY 12,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Jan 31, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, Tyler J. Garrett, ‘Anatomy of a Wyoming Appeal: A Practitioner's Guide for Civil Cases’, see 16 Wyo. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Unemployment compensation: leaving employment to become self-employed or to go into business for oneself as affecting right to unemployment compensation, 45 ALR5th 715.

§ 27-3-403.
Determination; disputed claims; hearing; decision; notice.

The commission shall appoint an impartial appeal tribunal to hear and decide disputed claims. The tribunal shall be a salaried examiner or a body consisting of three (3) members, one (1) a salaried examiner serving as chairman, one (1) a representative of employers and one (1) a representative of employees. The representatives of employers and employees shall serve at the pleasure of the commission and shall receive not more than ten dollars ($10.00) per day of service plus necessary expenses. No person shall serve or participate on behalf of the commission if he is an interested party to the proceeding. The commission may designate an alternate to serve in the absence or disqualification of a member of an appeal tribunal. The chairman shall act alone in the absence or disqualification of any member. A hearing shall not proceed unless the chairman is present.

After providing interested parties notice of and reasonable opportunity for hearing, the appeal tribunal shall make findings and conclusions and shall render a decision to affirm, modify or reverse a determination. If an appeal involves a question of services performed by a claimant in employment or for an employer, the tribunal shall give special notice of the issue and the pendency of the appeal to the employing unit and to the commission. After notice, both are parties to the proceeding and shall be given opportunity to offer evidence bearing on the question.

Notice of the tribunal’s decision shall be given promptly to the interested party by delivery or by mail to his last known address of record. The notice shall include a copy of the decision and the findings and conclusions in support of the decision. The decision is final unless further review is initiated pursuant to W.S.

27-3-404

.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Proof of mailing. —

The business custom and usage of the commission which would result in the mailing of a notice are sufficient to establish the fact of such mailing absent evidence to the contrary other than a bald statement that it was not received. Section 27-3-404(a) authorizes administrative review requested “within fifteen (15) days after notice is mailed or delivered.” Such authorization is just as mandatory and jurisdictional as is a timely filing of a petition for review of an administrative action by a district court. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Young, 713 P.2d 198,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

Koch v. Dep't of Empl., 2013 WY 12,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Jan 31, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in unemployment compensation proceedings, 90 ALR4th 532.

§ 27-3-404.
Determination; review by commission; disposition; notice; reconsideration.

The commission may within twenty-eight (28) days after notice is mailed or delivered:

Review a decision of an appeal tribunal;

Review a determination of a special examiner; or

Grant an appeal from a decision upon application filed by any party entitled to notice. An appeal shall be granted if a decision is not unanimous or if a determination is not affirmed by the appeal tribunal.

Upon review or appeal and based on evidence previously submitted or upon additional evidence it may direct be taken, the commission may affirm, modify or reverse the findings and conclusions of the appeal tribunal. Proceedings before an appeal tribunal may be removed to the commission or transferred to another tribunal. A proceeding removed to the commission prior to completion of the hearing shall be heard by the commission in accordance with requirements for tribunal proceedings.

The commission shall promptly notify parties to a proceeding of its decision including findings and conclusions. The decision is final unless judicial review is initiated pursuant to this article. A denial of an appeal by the commission is subject to judicial review. Review shall be initiated within the prescribed time beginning from the date notice of the denial is mailed or delivered.

Subject to limitations prescribed under W.S. 27-3-402(c), the commission may reconsider a determination provided by a final decision of an appeal tribunal and may apply to the tribunal for a revised decision.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1992, ch. 10, § 1; 2015 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “twenty-eight (28) days” for “fifteen (15) days.”

Reconsideration of ruling. —

The employment security commission lacks authority to reconsider its own ruling in contested case when that ruling was made by the full commission at the final stage of intra-agency review, unless the grounds for reconsideration listed in § 27-3-402(c) are present. Decisions of the full commission sitting as an appellate tribunal are final unless a judicial appeal is taken to the district court by an unsuccessful party. Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Proof of mailing. —

The business custom and usage of the commission which would result in the mailing of a notice are sufficient to establish the fact of such mailing absent evidence to the contrary other than a bald statement that it was not received. Subsection (a) authorizes administrative review requested “within fifteen (15) days after notice is mailed or delivered.” Such authorization is just as mandatory and jurisdictional as is a timely filing of a petition for review of an administrative action by a district court. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Young, 713 P.2d 198,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1986).

Unemployment Insurance Commission is final authority. —

The Unemployment Insurance Commission is the final agency adjudicating authority; the Commission's final decision is the decision to be reviewed by the district court under Rule 12 of Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, not those decisions which were made at intermediate stages in the process. City of Casper v. Wyoming Dep't of Employment, Unemployment Ins. Div., 851 P.2d 1,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1993).

Commission acted within its authority. —

Wyoming Department of Employment, Unemployment Insurance Commission acted within its authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-3-404(b) when it reviewed and reversed a hearing examiner's decision awarding an employee unemployment benefits; the record showed that the action proceeded through the agency review process as authorized by statute. Koch v. Dep't of Empl., 2013 WY 12, 294 P.3d 888,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2013).

Quoted

in

Barker v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 791 P.2d 583,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1990).

Stated in

State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs. v. Kinneman, 2016 WY 79, 377 P.3d 776,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 27-3-405.
Conduct of hearing or appeal; consolidation of claims; record; witness expenses.

A hearing or appeal before a tribunal under this article shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

Hearings on claims by more than one (1) individual or on claims by an individual for two (2) or more weeks of unemployment may be consolidated for purposes of adjudication if there is substantially similar evidence and the examiner or tribunal with jurisdiction determines the consolidation is not prejudicial to any party.

A record shall be kept of all testimony and proceedings before a special examiner or an appeal tribunal. Records shall be maintained under this subsection until final disposition of the matter.

Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to this act shall be reimbursed at a rate determined by the commission. The commission may refuse reimbursement to any employer who after notice fails to voluntarily appear for any determination of liability. Expenses of witnesses subpoenaed on behalf of the commission or any claimant are part of the expense of administering this act.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1.

Stated

in

Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of telephone testimony or hearings in unemployment compensation proceedings, 90 ALR4th 532.

§ 27-3-406.
Determinations deemed conclusive; matters of law binding; limiting actions.

Except for reconsideration pursuant to W.S. 27-3-402(c) and 27-3-404(d), a right, fact or matter in issue adjudicated in a final determination, redetermination or decision on appeal under this article is conclusive for purposes of this act. Subject to appeal proceedings and judicial review and regardless of notice, a determination, redetermination or decision on benefit rights is not subject to collateral attack by an employing unit.

Unless expressly or impliedly overruled by the commission or a court of competent jurisdiction, principles of law adjudicated under a final decision of the commission or an appeal tribunal are binding on the commission, a special examiner and an appeal tribunal in proceedings involving similar questions of law.

Any determination, redetermination, finding of fact, conclusion of law, order, decision or final judgment entered or made by a deputy, appeal tribunal, special examiner, the department, the commission or a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to this act or the rules and regulations of the commission is binding only between the department and all adverse parties thereto, and is not binding, conclusive or admissible in any separate or subsequent action or proceeding between an individual and employing unit previously subject to this act, regardless of whether the prior action before the department or commission was between the same or related parties or involved the same facts.

Any determination, finding of fact, conclusion of law, order, decision or final judgment, not made or entered by the department or commission, is not binding upon the department when administering this act except when the department or commission was a party to an action or proceeding brought in a court of competent jurisdiction of this state or of the United States.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Resignation effective at a future date. —

Unemployment insurance commission was required to follow its existing precedent concerning situations where employee gives a resignation notice effective at a future date, but employer terminates employee before that date is reached. Pette v. State ex rel. Department of Empl., 968 P.2d 952,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Nelson v. Crimson Enters., Inc., 777 P.2d 73,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 27-3-407.
Right to judicial review; appeal to supreme court; entry of order by commission.

Any person aggrieved or adversely affected by a final decision under this act may obtain judicial review by filing a petition for review with the district court of jurisdiction. Review by the court shall be as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] and shall be given precedence over all other civil cases except those under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act [§

27-14-101

et seq.].

A decision of the district court may be appealed to the supreme court. The appeal shall be taken in the same manner as other civil cases.

Exceptions to the ruling of the commission and posting of bond are not required to initiate a proceeding for judicial review or to enter an appeal from the decision of the court. The commission shall enter an order in accordance with the court decision.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Payment under protest not required. —

This section provides for judicial review based upon the requirements of §

16-3-114

of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, — “aggrieved or adversely affected” — but does not specifically require payment under protest before obtaining judicial review. Wyoming Dep't of Employment v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Bettcher v. Wyoming Dep't of Emp., 884 P.2d 635,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Sellers v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 760 P.2d 394,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 27-3-408.
Right of department and commission to notice and representation; fees; access to records.

The department and commission shall be treated as one (1) party entitled to notice in any proceeding before a special examiner, an appeal tribunal or a court of appeal. In any proceeding for judicial review under W.S.

27-3-407

, the department and commission may be represented by a qualified attorney employed pursuant to W.S.

27-3-609

.

A claimant shall not be assessed fees for proceedings under this act by the department, commission or the court. The claimant may be represented by counsel or other authorized agent at the claimant’s expense.

Records of the department are open to inspection by the claimant, the employer or their legal representatives to the extent necessary to present or contest a claim or appeal in any proceeding under this act.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 6, 11; 1939, ch. 124, § 15; 1941, ch. 96, §§ 6, 10; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-106, 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 11; 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-27, 27-33; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1967, ch. 71, § 1; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

27-3-107

, 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1988, ch. 51, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 83, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Absent statutory authority, courts cannot order commission to pay claimant's attorney's fees,

and subsection (b), intending to protect the claimant against unreasonable attorney's fees, plainly provides that the court shall “approve” fees. To approve is not to order payment. Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Swartz, 740 P.2d 401,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 481

(Wyo. 1987) (decided prior to 1991 amendment).

§ 27-3-409.
Payment of benefits upon determination; repayment of overpaid benefits; penalty.

Benefits shall be paid in accordance with a determination, redetermination or decision until modified or reversed by a subsequent or pending redetermination or decision. A proceeding for judicial review under this article shall not operate as a supersedeas or stay nor shall the commission or the court issue an injunction, supersedeas, stay or other writ or process suspending the payment of benefits. Except as provided in W.S. 27-3-506(e), if a determination, redetermination or decision is reversed or modified, an employer’s account shall not be charged for benefits paid under an erroneous determination and benefits shall be paid or denied in accordance with the modifying or reversing redetermination or decision.

An individual receiving benefits under this act to which he is not entitled shall be liable for and repay the benefit. Repayment of the benefits shall be had by any combination of recoupment, recovery by civil action, offset through the treasury offset program of the United States treasury, 26 U.S.C. Section 6402(f), or voluntary reimbursement agreement:

The department in its discretion, may recoup the benefit amount liable to be repaid by offsetting, without civil action, against future benefits payable to the individual under this act within five (5) years from the effective date of the claim resulting in the overpayment if the claim was not fraudulent. If the claim resulting in the overpayment was fraudulent, the five (5) year limit on recoupment shall not apply. The department shall waive recoupment if an individual is without fault in receiving the benefits and it defeats the purpose of this act or is against equity and good conscience as considered by the department in accordance with regulations of the commission;

The department may also recover overpaid benefits from an individual by civil action brought in the name of the department;

The department in its discretion, without civil action, may accept repayment of overpaid benefits by reimbursement from an individual pursuant to a payment schedule approved by the department.

The department may recoup or recover overpayment of benefits to any individual under another state law if a state certifies to the department the facts involved, the overpaid individual is liable for repayment of benefits and the state requests the department to do so. Repayment either by recoupment or recovery shall be had pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. Repayment shall be equal to the amount of overpayment determined by the requesting state.

Any overpayment of benefits fraudulently received shall be assessed a penalty equal to twenty percent (20%) of the amount of overpayment and an additional five percent (5%) penalty on the remaining unpaid balance at the end of every six (6) months. One-fourth (1/4) of the amounts collected pursuant to the initial penalty and all of the additional penalties shall be paid into the employment security revenue account and the department shall utilize those collected amounts for administrative costs of overpayment collection, fraud investigation, developing and providing educational programs for this act. Three-fourths (3/4) of the amounts collected pursuant to the initial penalty shall be paid into the unemployment trust fund account. Offset shall not be used to recover amounts due under this section.

The department shall cancel the amount of overpayment or penalty due on any overpayment when:

The individual is deceased with no estate or the estate is closed and all assets are distributed; or

The individual is adjudicated insolvent by a court of competent jurisdiction with no remaining assets.

The department may cancel the amount of overpayments or penalty due on any overpayment after eight (8) years from the effective date of the claim resulting in the overpayment when:

The individual cannot be located;

The individual is totally unable to work; or

The department’s records show the individual earned covered wages of less than one-half (1/2) the average weekly wage within Wyoming in the most recent calendar year.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 6; 1941, ch. 96, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 54-106; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-27; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 6 to 8; 1969, ch. 60, § 2; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 35, § 1; 1993, ch. 19, § 1; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; 2007, ch. 177, § 1; 2010, ch. 66, § 1; 2013 ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 29, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b)(i), inserted “if the claim was not fraudulent,” and inserted the second sentence; in (f), substituted “after the expiration of the time period described in paragraph (b)(i) of this section” for “five (5) years after the effective date of the claim resulting in an overpayment” in the introductory language, deleted “within the state of Wyoming” following “located” at the end of the sentence in (i).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “by any combination of” for “either by,” and “voluntary reimbursement agreement” for “both”; added (b)(iii); and in the introductory language of (f), substituted “eight (8) years from the effective date of the claim resulting in the overpayment” for “the expiration of the time period described in paragraph (b)(i) of this section.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the exception in the third sentence of (a) and rewrote (d).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, inserted “, offset through the treasury offset program of the United States treasury,
26 U.S.C. Section 6402(f),” in (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Plain meaning of subsection (b)(i)

is that absence of fault must be conjoined with findings that recoupment defeats the purpose of this chapter or is against equity and good conscience according to unemployment insurance commission regulations. Gibson v. Wyoming Div. of Unemployment Ins., 907 P.2d 1306,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1995) (decided prior to 2003 amendment).

Applied

in

Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Banks, 854 P.2d 709,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Empl. v. Porter, 986 P.2d 148,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1999).